Massachusetts, session 194th, H5504.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the town of
Hingham, Massachusetts may transfer to the Massachusetts department of transportation for
highway purposes certain parcels of land under the care, custody and control of the town of
Hingham select board, and located in the town of Hingham, identified on a plan of land entitled,
“Massachusetts Department of Transportation Highway Division Plan and Profile of Route 3A /
Summer Street / Rockland Street in the Town of Hingham Plymouth County Preliminary Right
of Way Plans”, which plan is on file with the Massachusetts department of transportation.
SECTION 2. (a) As consideration for the transfers authorized by Section 1 herein, the
town of Hingham shall transfer to its conservation commission subject to the provisions of
Article 97 of the Articles of Amendment to the Constitution of the Commonwealth and M.G.L.
c. 3, § 5A, the care, custody and control of an approximately 8 acre portion of the approximately
of 2

10.78 acre parcel of land shown as Assessor’s Map 106, Lot 3 and known as 0 Hobart Street,
located in the town of Hingham, as shown on a plan on file with town of Hingham town clerk,
which land is currently under the care, custody and control of the town of Hingham select board
for general municipal purposes.
(b) As additional consideration for the transfers authorized by Section 1 herein, and in
addition to the land dedicated in Section 2(a) above, the Massachusetts department of
transportation shall compensate the town of Hingham in an amount not less than 110 percent of
the fair market value or value in use of the transferred lands, whichever is greater, as determined
by a professional appraisal. Any funds transferred under this section shall be deposited in a fund
dedicated to conservation of land in the town of Hingham.
SECTION 3. The Massachusetts department of transportation shall assume all costs
associated with engineering, surveys, appraisal, deed preparation and other expenses necessary to
execute the conveyances authorized by this act.
SECTION 4. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 2